Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1297.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2912-D of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2912-D. Application for certification.To be considered for a certification, an owner or operator of a computer data center shall submit to the department an 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 application on a form prescribed by the department that includes the following:* * *(4.1) Beginning January 1, 2030, if the computer data center is to qualify under sections 2915-D and 2915.1-D, an affirmation, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the computer data center has satisfied the certification requirements under sections 2915-D and 2915.1-D.* * *Section 2. Section 2914-D(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 2914-D. Separation of facilities.(a) Separate certification.--An owner or operator of a computer data center may separate a facility into one or more computer data centers, which may each receive a separate certification, if each computer data center individually meets the requirements prescribed in section 2915-D[.] and, beginning January 1, 2030, the requirements prescribed in sections 2915-D and 2915.1-D . * * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2915.1-D. Additional eligibility requirements.In addition to the requirements under section 2915-D, beginning January 1, 2030, a computer data center must meet all of the following requirements:(1) The computer data center shall purchase 100% of the computer data center's annual electric load from a Tier I alternative energy source as defined in section 2 of the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act.20260SB1297PN1633 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) T he computer data center shall demonstrate sufficient investment in environmental management and energy efficiency measures to provide systemwide benefits. The department shall determine that t he owner or operator of the computer data center has demonstrated sufficient investment in environmental management and energy efficiency measures to provide systemwide benefits if the computer data center has attained certification under International Organization For Standardization 14001 environmental management and two or more of the following sustainable design or green building standards on the effective date of this paragraph:(i) Building Research Establishment Environmental Assessment Methodology (BREEAM) for new construction or BREEAM in-use.(ii) Energy Star.(iii) Envision.(iv) ISO 50001 energy management.(v) Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) for building design and construction or LEED for operations and maintenance.(vi) Green Globes for new construction or Green Globes for existing buildings.(vii) UL 3223.(viii) Any other reasonable standards approved by the department.Section 4. Sections 2916-D and 2917-D(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 2916-D. Notification.(a) Requirements satisfied.--On or before the fourth anniversary of the certification of a computer data center, the 20260SB1297PN1633 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owner or operator of a computer data center shall notify the department in writing whether the computer data center for which the certification is requested has satisfied the requirements prescribed in section 2915-D and, beginning January 1, 2030, the requirements prescribed in sections 2915-D and 2915.1-D.(b) Records.--Until a computer data center satisfies the requirements prescribed in section 2915-D, and, beginning January 1, 2030, the requirements prescribed in sections 2915-D and 2915.1-D, the owner, operator and qualified tenants shall maintain detailed records of all investments created by the computer data center, including costs of buildings and computer data center equipment, and all tax refunds directly received by the owner, operator or qualified tenant.Section 2917-D. Revocation of certification.(a) Revocation.--If the department determines that the requirements of section 2915-D have not been satisfied or , beginning January 1, 2030, the requirements of sections 2915-D and 2915.1-D have not been satisfied, the department may revoke the certification of a computer data center.* * *Section 5. Section 2932-D(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2932-D. Application for certification.(a) Application.--To be considered for a certification, an owner or operator of a computer data center shall submit to the department an application on a form prescribed by the department that includes all of the following:* * *(4) Beginning January 1, 2030, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the 20260SB1297PN1633 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 computer data center is expected to satisfy the certification requirements prescribed under sections 2935-D and 2935.1-D.* * *Section 6. Section 2934-D(a) and (c) of the act are amended to read:Section 2934-D. Separation of facilities.(a) Separate certification.--An owner or operator of a computer data center may separate a facility into one or more computer data centers, which may each receive a separate certification, if each computer data center individually meets the requirements prescribed in section 2935-D and, beginning January 1, 2030, the requirements prescribed in sections 2935-D and 2935.1-D.* * *(c) Aggregation.--An owner or operator may aggregate one or more parcels, buildings or condominiums in a facility into a single computer data center for certification under this subarticle if, in the aggregate, the parcels, buildings and condominiums meet the requirements prescribed in section 2935-D and, beginning January 1, 2030, the requirements prescribed in sections 2935-D and 2935.1-D.Section 7. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2935.1-D. Additional eligibility requirements.In addition to the requirements under section 2935-D, i n order to be certified under this subarticle, beginning January 1, 2030, an owner or operator of a computer data center must meet all of the following requirements:(1) The owner or operator of the computer data center shall purchase 100% of the computer data center's annual electric load from a Tier I alternative energy source as 20260SB1297PN1633 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 defined in section 2 of the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act.(2) The owner or operator of the computer data center shall demonstrate sufficient investment in environmental management and energy efficiency measures to provide system-wide benefits. The department shall determine that t he owner or operator of the computer data center has demonstrated sufficient investment in environmental management and energy efficiency measures to provide system-wide benefits if the computer data center has attained certification under International Organization For Standardization 14001 environmental management and two or more of the following sustainable design or green building standards on the effective date of this paragraph:(i) Building Research Establishment Environmental Assessment Methodology (BREEAM) for new construction or BREEAM in-use.(ii) Energy Star.(iii) Envision.(iv) ISO 50001 energy management.(v) Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) for building design and construction or LEED for operations and maintenance.(vi) Green Globes for new construction or Green Globes for existing buildings.(vii) UL 3223.(viii) Any other reasonable standards approved by the department.Section 8. Sections 2936-D(a) and 2937-D(a) of the act are 20260SB1297PN1633 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amended to read:Section 2936-D. Notification and records.(a) Requirements satisfied.--On or before the fourth anniversary of the certification of a computer data center, the owner or operator of the computer data center shall notify the department in writing whether the computer data center for which the certification is requested has satisfied the requirements prescribed under section 2935-D and, beginning January 1, 2030, the requirements prescribed in sections 2935-D and 2935.1-D.* * *Section 2937-D. Revocation of certification.(a) Revocation.--If the department determines that the requirements of section 2935-D have not been satisfied or , beginning January 1, 2030, the requirements of sections 2935-D and 2935.1-D have not been satisfied, the department may revoke the certification of a computer data center.* * *Section 9. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1297PN1633 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718